Hawaii statutes.
§273-11 Right to provide same, subject to
rights of others. Such railroad companies with the consent of the
comptroller may provide, construct and install, maintain, change, and repair
such means for the transmission and return of electric, compressed air, or
other motive power for such motive purposes along, upon, and over such
highways, streets, or roads upon which they have rights of way by franchise as
may from time to time be necessary for the operation of the railroads; provided
that the railroad companies shall so exercise this right that unnecessary
injury or deterioration shall not occur nor be done to the water pipes, sewer
pipes, gas pipes, or other property of the State, or of any person and shall
save the State, or any person harmless and indemnified from all loss, cost,
damage, and expense by reason thereof. [L 1907, c 88, §2; RL 1925, §898; RL
1935, §1804; RL 1945, §5062; RL 1955, §106-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS
§273-11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next